New Jersey, session 221, A2828.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Commissioner of Corrections, in collaboration with the Commissioner of Human Services, the county welfare agencies, and the county administrators of the county correctional facilities, shall ensure that an inmate of a State prison or county correctional facility has the opportunity to participate in: (1)   a peer-led Medicaid pre-enrollment session at least 60 days prior to release from the State prison or county correctional facility.  The session shall include, at a minimum, information regarding the benefits of Medicaid, the Medicaid application process, and pertinent differences between the managed care plans available under the program; and (2)   an enrollment session no more than five calendar days following the peer-led Medicaid pre-enrollment session required under paragraph (1) of this subsection.  During the session, county welfare agency staff or designated State prison or county correctional facility personnel, who have received training from the Department of Human Services regarding the screening and enrollment process for Medicaid, shall provide the inmate with assistance, either in person or via telephone, in completing a Medicaid application. b.    The Commissioner of Corrections, in collaboration with the Commissioner of Human Services, the county welfare agencies, and the county administrators of the county correctional facilities, shall establish a process by which the Department of Human Services or another Medicaid eligibility determination agency notifies an inmate, who completes a Medicaid application during a Medicaid enrollment session, of the inmates eligibility determination prior to release from the State prison or county correctional facility and, if applicable, provides the inmate with a Medicaid identification card at the time of release from the State prison or county correctional facility. c.     Nothing in this section shall be construed to alter the eligibility standards for medical assistance under the Medicaid program. d.    As used in this section, Medicaid means the program established pursuant to P.L.1968, c.413 (C.30:4D-1 et seq.). 2.    This act shall take effect 60 days following the date of enactment.